src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Kalo Finnish Romani verb inflection

Under construction.

First come auxiliaries, then lexical verb classes. 
Finally there is a section on common verb suffixes.

## Auxiliaries

**LEXICON HIN** spells out the whole paradigm

**LEXICON VAA** spells out the whole paradigm

## Lexical verbs

The lexical setup follows the grammar, but
several lexica may probably be unified.

BOLL primary verb, other than r-stem

TSEER primary verb, r-stem, d pret

**LEXICON TRAAD** cns pres and id pret

**LEXICON TSUUV** cns pres and nd pret

**LEXICON LURR** cns pres and d pret

**LEXICON DZAMB** cns pres and id pret

**LEXICON MANG** cns pres and jom pret

**LEXICON DIKK** cns pres and jom pret

**LEXICON KAMM** cns pres and jom pret

**LEXICON BAHH** cns pres and t pret

**LEXICON MEKK** cns pres and l/n pret

**LEXICON D** for "to do", cns pres and jom pret

**LEXICON DZA** vow pres and id pret

**LEXICON PILA** cns pres and id pret "juoda"

## Transitive morphology

**LEXICON RAKKAVELA** cns pres and ad pret + parallel forms

**LEXICON PHAGARVELA** cns pres and ard pret

**LEXICON TSJALJEVELA** cns pres and ed pret

**LEXICON TSEEKJIVELA**  id pret

**LEXICON DZORALVELA** cns pres and ad pret

## Intransitive morphology

**LEXICON GARUVELA** cns pres and jom pret

**LEXICON AGURVELA** cns pres and jom pret

## Person suffixes

Here come the person suffixes.

**LEXICON cns_pressuff** cns pres: aa, eha, ela, ...

**LEXICON vow_pressuff** vcow pres: a, ha, la, ...

**LEXICON pretsuff** om, al, as...

**LEXICON pretsuff_jom** jom, jal, lo, ...

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-rmf/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
